Maryland, session 2025, HB1415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1415*

HOUSE BILL 1415
(b) (1) “Agricultural building” means a structure that is used primarily to
cultivate, manufacture, process, or produce agricultural crops, raw materials, products, or
commodities.
(2) “Agricultural building” includes a greenhouse.
(c) “Building” has the meaning stated in the International Building Code.
(d) “Commercial building” means a building that is subject to the commercial
provisions of the International Energy Conservation Code.
(e) (1) “Covered building” means a building that:
(i) 1. Is a commercial or multifamily residential building in the
State; or
2. Is owned by the State; and
(ii) Has a gross floor area of 35,000 square feet or more, excluding
the parking garage area.
(2) “Covered building” does not include:
(i) A building designated as a historic property under federal, State,
or local law;
(ii) A public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school building;
(iii) A manufacturing building; or
(iv) An agricultural building.
(f) “Direct greenhouse gas emissions” means greenhouse gas emissions produced
on–site by covered buildings.
(g) “District energy” means thermal energy generated at one or more central
facilities that produce hot water, steam, or chilled water that then flows through a network
of insulated underground pipes to provide hot water, space heating, air conditioning, or
chilled water to nearby buildings.
2–1602.
(a) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE Department
shall develop building energy performance standards for covered buildings that achieve:

HOUSE BILL 1415 3
(1) A 20% reduction in net direct greenhouse gas emissions on or before
January 1, 2030, as compared with 2025 levels for average buildings of similar construction;
and
(2) Net–zero direct greenhouse gas emissions on or before January 1, 2040.
(b) To facilitate the development of building energy performance standards under
this section, the Department shall require the owners of covered buildings to measure and
report direct emissions data to the Department annually beginning in 2025.
(c) (1) On or before June 1, 2023, the Department shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
(2) Regulations adopted under this section shall:
(i) Subject to items (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph AND SUBSECTION
(F) OF THIS SECTION, include energy use intensity targets by building type;
(ii) As necessary, include special provisions or exceptions to account
for:
1. Building age;
2. Regional differences;
3. The unique needs of particular building or occupancy
types, including health care facilities, laboratories, assisted living and nursing facilities,
military buildings, critical infrastructure, and buildings used in life sciences as defined in
§ 3–201 of the Economic Development Article; and
4. The use of district energy systems and biofuels by covered
buildings;
(iii) Consider the needs of the owners of covered buildings who:
1. Are not responsible for the design, modification, fixtures,
or equipment of commercial tenants;
2. Do not have access to or control over building energy
systems that are used or controlled by commercial tenants; or
3. Own buildings occupied by commercial tenants who are
responsible for all maintenance of and repairs to the buildings;
(iv) Provide maximum flexibility to the owners of covered buildings
to comply with building energy performance standards;

HOUSE BILL 1415
(v) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, include an alternative
compliance pathway allowing the owner of a covered building to pay a fee for greenhouse
gas emissions attributable to the building’s failure to meet direct greenhouse gas emissions
reduction targets; and
(vi) To the extent authorized by law, include financial incentives
recommended by the Building Energy Transition Implementation Task Force.
(3) The Department may not set an alternative compliance fee that is less
than the social cost of greenhouse gases adopted by the Department or the U.S.
Environmental Protection Agency.
(d) Electric companies and gas companies shall provide energy data, including
whole–building and aggregate data, to the owners of covered buildings for benchmarking
purposes.
(e) In calculating the statewide standards developed by the Department under
this section, an owner of a covered building may not consider greenhouse gas emissions or
energy use by a commercial tenant of the covered building that:
(1) Is a food service facility as defined in COMAR 10.15.03.02; and
(2) Engages in commercial cooking and water heating.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REQUIRE A COVERED BUILDING THAT
RECEIVED A USE AND OCCUPANCY PERMIT BEFORE JUNE 1, 2022, TO COMPLY WITH
BUILDING ENERGY PERFORMANCE STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER OR ENERGY USE
INTENSITY TARGETS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION UNTIL IT
BECOMES NECESSARY TO REPLACE LIGHTING SYSTEMS, HEATING, VENTILATING,
AND AIR CONDITIONING (HVAC) SYSTEMS, OR OTHER MAJOR COMPONENTS OF THE
COVERED BUILDING DUE TO THE FAILURE OF THOSE COMPONENTS OR AS A RESULT
OF THE END OF LIFE OF THOSE COMPONENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.